src/hyphenDicts/hyph_es.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 3
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 3
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
%
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
%                 %
% hyph-es j3  6.3 %
%   2018-12-12    %
%                 %
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
NOHYPHEN -,–,',’,/,:,.
2.1
2,1
2;1
2:1
2´2
2`2
2'2
2‘2
2’2
1“2
2”1
1‹2
2›1
1«2
2»1
1(2
2)1
1[2
2]1
1{2
2}1
1¡2
2!1
1¿2
2?1
2-2
2–2
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
%%%                 NO  BORRES  LA  SIGUIENTE  LINEA                 %%%
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
NEXTLEVEL
%
b2l
b2r
c2h
ch2r
c2k
ck2l
c2l
c2r
d2h
d2r
f2l
f2r
g2h
g2l
g2r
j2l
k2h
k2l
k2r
k2w
l2l
p2h
p2l
p2r
r2r
s2h
t2h
t2r
t2s
t2x
t2z
v2l
v2r
z2h
z2r
%
.acro1
.acró1
.ae2r
.a2ha
.a2he
.a2hé
.a2hi
.a2hí
.a2ho
.a2hó
.a2hu
.an1ep2
.an1iso3
.an1isó3
.apo1
.atto1
.auto1
.ba
.bá
.b2d
.be
.bé
.b2h
.bi
.bí
.bien1
.bie1nal
.bie1na3les
.bie1nes
.bie1nio
.bio1
.bi1óx
.bis1
.biz1
.b2j
.bla
.blá
.ble
.blé
.bli
.blí
.blo
.bló
.blu
.blú
.bly
.bo
.bó
.bra
.brá
.bre
.bré
.bri
.brí
.bro
.bró
.bru
.brú
.bry
.bu
.bú
.bü
.by
.ca
.cá
.ce
.cé
.cha
.chá
.che
.ché
.chi
.chí
.cho
.chó
.chra
.chrá
.chre
.chré
.chri
.chrí
.chro
.chró
.chru
.chrú
.chry
.chu
.chú
.chy
.ci
.cí
.ciber1
.ci1be2ra
.cla
.clá
.cle
.clé
.cli
.clí
.clo
.cló
.clu
.clú
.cly
.cne
.cni
.co
.có
.coá
.con1s
.con8s1c
.con8s1p
.con8s1t
.co1o2
.cra
.crá
.cre
.cré
.cri
.crí
.cro
.cró
.cru
.crú
.cry
.crys1t
.cte
.cu
.cú
.cü
.cuál1
.cual1q2
.cuan1
.cuán1
.c2v
.cy
.cza
.cze
.da
.dá
.d2d
.de
.dé
.des1a
.de1sa3bi
.de1sa3bor.
.de1sa3bo5ra
.de1sa3bo5ri
.de1sa3bri5d
.de1sa3cr
.de1sa3in
.de1sa3la
.de1sa3li5n
.de1sa3li5v
.de1sas3tr
.de1sa3zo
.de1sa3zó
.des1e3ch
.des1e3d
.des1e3le
.des1em3
.de1sem3bl
.de1se3me5j
.des1en
.des1es
.des1h
.des1ideo
.des1igu
.des1ilu
.des1im
.des1in
.de1si3ne
.des1ob
.des1oc
.des1od
.des1oi
.des1oí
.des1oj
.des1op
.des1or
.de1sor3t
.des1ov
.des1ox
.des1oy
.des1ubi
.des1un
.des1uñ
.des1ur3d
.des1usa
.des1usá
.des1use
.des1usé
.des1uso
.des1usó
.dha
.dhá
.dhe
.dhé
.dhi
.dhí
.dho
.dhó
.dhu
.dhú
.dhy
.di
.dí
.d2j
.do
.dó
.dra
.drá
.dre
.dré
.dri
.drí
.dro
.dró
.dru
.drú
.dry
.d2s
.ds2ch
.dse
.du
.dú
.dü
.d2v
.d2w
.dy
.d2z
.dza
.dzá
.dze
.dzé
.dzi
.dzí
.dzo
.dzó
.dzu
.dzú
.dzy
.en1a
.euro1
.ex1
.exi1l
.exis1t
.exi1t
.exo1
.fa
.fá
.fe
.fé
.fi
.fí
.fla
.flá
.fle
.flé
.fli
.flí
.flo
.fló
.flu
.flú
.fly
.fo
.fó
.fra
.frá
.fre
.fré
.fri
.frí
.fro
.fró
.fru
.frú
.fry
.fu
.fú
.fü
.fy
.ga
.gá
.g2b
.g2d
.ge
.gé
.gha
.ghá
.ghe
.ghé
.ghi
.ghí
.gho
.ghó
.ghu
.ghú
.ghy
.gi
.gí
.g2j
.gla
.glá
.gle
.glé
.gli
.glí
.glo
.gló
.glu
.glú
.gly
.gna
.gne
.gné
.gno
.gnó
.gnu
.go
.gó
.gra
.grá
.gre
.gré
.gri
.grí
.gro
.gró
.gru
.grú
.gry
.gu
.gú
.gü
.gua
.guá
.güa
.gue
.gué
.güe
.güé
.gui
.guí
.güi
.güí
.guo
.guó
.güo
.g2w
.gy
.ha
.há
.ha2i
.ha2o
.ha2u
.he
.hé
.he2a
.he2u
.hi
.hí
.hi2a
.hi2e
.hi2o
.hiper1r
.ho
.hó
.ho2a
.ho2o
.ho2u
.hu
.hú
.hü
.hu2a
.hu2á
.hu2e
.hu2é
.hu2i
.hy
.in1a
.in1e
.in1o
.in1s
.in8s1c
.in8s1p
.in8s1t
.inter1
.in1te3rac5
.in1te3re5sa
.in1te3re5sá
.in1te3re5se
.in1te3re5sé
.in1te3rés
.in1te3re5so
.in1te3re5só
.in1te3ria
.in1te3ri5na
.in1te3ri5ná
.in1te3ri5ne
.in1te3ri5né
.in1te3ri5ni
.in1te3ri5no
.in1te3ri5nó
.in1te3rio
.in1te3rro
.in1te3rru
.in1u
.inun1
.ja
.já
.je
.jé
.ji
.jí
.jla
.jlá
.jle
.jlé
.jli
.jlí
.jlo
.jló
.jlu
.jlú
.jly
.jo
.jó
.ju
.jú
.jü
.jy
.ka
.ká
.ke
.ké
.kha
.khá
.khe
.khé
.khi
.khí
.kho
.khó
.khu
.khú
.khy
.ki
.kí
.kla
.klá
.kle
.klé
.kli
.klí
.klo
.kló
.klu
.klú
.kly
.kna
.kne
.kni
.kno
.knu
.ko
.kó
.kra
.krá
.kre
.kré
.kri
.krí
.kro
.kró
.kru
.krú
.kry
.ku
.kú
.kü
.kwa
.kwá
.kwe
.kwé
.kwi
.kwí
.kwo
.kwó
.kwu
.kwú
.kwy
.ky
.la
.lá
.le
.lé
.li
.lí
.lla
.llá
.lle
.llé
.lli
.llí
.llo
.lló
.llu
.llú
.lly
.lo
.ló
.lu
.lú
.lü
.ly
.ly1c
.ly1ch
.ly1d
.ly1ph
.ly1r
.ma
.má
.m2b
.mba
.m2c
.me
.mé
.m2h
.mi
.mí
.m2m
.m2n
.mne
.mo
.mó
.m2p
.m2r
.m2s
.mu
.mú
.mü
.m2w
.my
.m2z
.na
.ná
.n2d
.ndo
.ne
.né
.n2g
.ni
.ní
.no
.nó
.nu
.nú
.nü
.ny
.nym1ph
.ña
.ñá
.ñe
.ñé
.ñi
.ñí
.ño
.ñó
.ñu
.ñú
.ñü
.pa
.pá
.pan1eu3
.pe
.pé
.p2f
.pha
.phá
.phe
.phé
.phi
.phí
.pho
.phó
.phu
.phú
.phy
.pi
.pí
.pla
.plá
.ple
.plé
.pli
.plí
.plo
.pló
.plu
.plú
.ply
.p2n
.pne
.po
.pó
.po1ly3
.pra
.prá
.pre
.pré
.pri
.prí
.pro
.pró
.pru
.prú
.pry
.p2s
.pse
.psi
.psí
.pso
.p2t
.pte
.pti
.pto
.pu
.pú
.pü
.py
.pyc1n
.qa
.qá
.qe
.qé
.qi
.qí
.qo
.qó
.qú
.qü
.qua
.que
.qué
.qui
.quí
.quo
.qy
.ra
.rá
.re
.ré
.rha
.rhá
.rhe
.rhé
.rhi
.rhí
.rho
.rhó
.rhu
.rhú
.rhy
.ri
.rí
.ro
.ró
.ru
.rú
.rü
.ry
.sa
.sá
.s2c
.sca
.sce
.s2ch2
.s2ch2w
.sci
.sco
.scu
.se
.sé
.sha
.shá
.she
.shé
.shi
.shí
.sho
.shó
.sh2r2
.shu
.shú
.shy
.si
.sí
.s2k
.ska
.ske
.ski
.sko
.sku
.s2l
.sla
.sle
.sli
.slo
.slu
.s2m
.s2n
.so
.só
.so1as
.s2p
.spa
.spe
.s2ph
.spi
.s2pl
.spo
.s2pr
.spu
.s2py1
.squ
.s2t
.sta
.ste
.s2th
.sti
.sto
.s2tr
.stu
.sty1
.su
.sú
.sü
.sub1
.su1ble3
.su1bli3
.sud1es3
.sud1oes3
.super1
.su1pe3rio
.sur1es3
.sur1oes3
.s2v
.s2w
.swa
.swe
.swi
.swo
.swu
.sy
.sy2m1
.sy2s1
.s2z
.szy2m1b
.ta
.tá
.t2ch
.te
.té
.tha
.thá
.the
.thé
.thi
.thí
.tho
.thó
.th2r
.thra
.thre
.thri
.thro
.thru
.thu
.thú
.thy
.ti
.tí
.t2j
.tla
.tlá
.tle
.tlé
.tli
.tlí
.tlo
.tló
.tlu
.tlú
.tly
.to
.tó
.tra
.trá
.trans1al
.trans1an
.trans1at
.trans1oce
.trans1ur
.tras1al
.tras1an
.tras1at
.tras1h
.tras1oce
.tras1ur
.tre
.tré
.tri
.trí
.tri1óx2
.tro
.tró
.tru
.trú
.try
.tsa
.tsá
.ts2ch
.tse
.tsé
.tsi
.tsí
.tso
.tsó
.tsu
.tsú
.tsy
.t2t
.tu
.tú
.tü
.t2w
.twa
.twe
.twi
.two
.txa
.txá
.txe
.txé
.txi
.txí
.txo
.txó
.txu
.txú
.txy
.ty
.tza
.tzá
.tze
.tzé
.tzi
.tzí
.tzo
.tzó
.tzu
.tzú
.tzy
.uni1
.va
.vá
.ve
.vé
.vi
.ví
.viz1
.vla
.vlá
.vle
.vlé
.vli
.vlí
.vlo
.vló
.vlu
.vlú
.vly
.vo
.vó
.vra
.vrá
.vre
.vré
.vri
.vrí
.vro
.vró
.vru
.vrú
.vry
.vu
.vú
.vü
.vy
.wa
.wá
.we
.wé
.wha
.whe
.whi
.who
.whu
.why
.wi
.wí
.wo
.wó
.wra
.wre
.wri
.wro
.wru
.wry
.wu
.wú
.wü
.wy
.xa
.xá
.xe
.xé
.xi
.xí
.xo
.xó
.xu
.xú
.xü
.xy
.ya
.yá
.ye
.yé
.yi
.yí
.yo
.yó
.yu
.yú
.yü
.za
.zá
.ze
.zé
.zha
.zhá
.zhe
.zhé
.zhi
.zhí
.zho
.zhó
.zhu
.zhú
.zhy
.zi
.zí
.zo
.zó
.zoo1
.zo2ó1
.zra
.zrá
.zre
.zré
.zri
.zrí
.zro
.zró
.zru
.zrú
.zry
.zu
.zú
.zü
.z2w
.zy
.zy2s1
%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%%
3ba
3bá
3be
3bé
3bi
3bí
3bo
3bó
3bu
3bú
3bü
3by
5bla
5blá
5ble
5blé
5bli
5blí
5blo
5bló
5blu
5blú
5bly
5bra
5brá
5bre
5bré
5bri
5brí
5bro
5bró
5bru
5brú
5bry
3ca
3cá
3ce
3cé
3ci
3cí
3co
3có
3cu
3cú
3cü
3cy
5cha
5chá
5che
5ché
5chi
5chí
5cho
5chó
5chu
5chú
5chy
5chra
5chrá
5chre
5chré
5chri
5chrí
5chro
5chró
5chru
5chrú
5chry
5cka
5cká
5cke
5cké
5cki
5ckí
5cko
5ckó
5cku
5ckú
5cky
5ckla
5cklá
5ckle
5cklé
5ckli
5cklí
5cklo
5ckló
5cklu
5cklú
5ckly
5cla
5clá
5cle
5clé
5cli
5clí
5clo
5cló
5clu
5clú
5cly
5cra
5crá
5cre
5cré
5cri
5crí
5cro
5cró
5cru
5crú
5cry
3da
3dá
3de
3dé
3di
3dí
3do
3dó
3du
3dú
3dü
3dy
5dha
5dhá
5dhe
5dhé
5dhi
5dhí
5dho
5dhó
5dhu
5dhú
5dhy
5dra
5drá
5dre
5dré
5dri
5drí
5dro
5dró
5dru
5drú
5dry
3fa
3fá
3fe
3fé
3fi
3fí
3fo
3fó
3fu
3fú
3fü
3fy
5fla
5flá
5fle
5flé
5fli
5flí
5flo
5fló
5flu
5flú
5fly
5fra
5frá
5fre
5fré
5fri
5frí
5fro
5fró
5fru
5frú
5fry
3ga
3gá
3ge
3gé
3gi
3gí
3go
3gó
3gu
3gú
3gü
3gy
5gha
5ghá
5ghe
5ghé
5ghi
5ghí
5gho
5ghó
5ghu
5ghú
5ghy
5gla
5glá
5gle
5glé
5gli
5glí
5glo
5gló
5glu
5glú
5gly
5gra
5grá
5gre
5gré
5gri
5grí
5gro
5gró
5gru
5grú
5gry
5gua
5guá
5güa
5gue
5gué
5güe
5güé
5gui
5guí
5güi
5güí
5guo
5guó
5güo
3ha
3há
3he
3hé
3hi
3hí
3ho
3hó
3hu
3hú
3hü
3hy
3ja
3já
3je
3jé
3ji
3jí
3jo
3jó
3ju
3jú
3jü
3jy
5jla
5jlá
5jle
5jlé
5jli
5jlí
5jlo
5jló
5jlu
5jlú
5jly
3ka
3ká
3ke
3ké
3ki
3kí
3ko
3kó
3ku
3kú
3kü
3ky
5kha
5khá
5khe
5khé
5khi
5khí
5kho
5khó
5khu
5khú
5khy
5kla
5klá
5kle
5klé
5kli
5klí
5klo
5kló
5klu
5klú
5kly
5kra
5krá
5kre
5kré
5kri
5krí
5kro
5kró
5kru
5krú
5kry
5kwa
5kwá
5kwe
5kwé
5kwi
5kwí
5kwo
5kwó
5kwu
5kwú
5kwy
3la
3lá
3le
3lé
3li
3lí
3lo
3ló
3lu
3lú
3lü
3ly
5lla
5llá
5lle
5llé
5lli
5llí
5llo
5lló
5llu
5llú
l5ly
3ma
3má
3me
3mé
3mi
3mí
3mo
3mó
3mu
3mú
3mü
3my
3na
3ná
3ne
3né
3ni
3ní
3no
3nó
3nu
3nú
3nü
3ny
3ña
3ñá
3ñe
3ñé
3ñi
3ñí
3ño
3ñó
3ñu
3ñú
3ñü
3pa
3pá
3pe
3pé
3pi
3pí
3po
3pó
3pu
3pú
3pü
3py
5pha
5phá
5phe
5phé
5phi
5phí
5pho
5phó
5phu
5phú
5phy
5pla
5plá
5ple
5plé
5pli
5plí
5plo
5pló
5plu
5plú
5ply
5pra
5prá
5pre
5pré
5pri
5prí
5pro
5pró
5pru
5prú
5pry
3qa
3qá
3qe
3qé
3qi
3qí
3qo
3qó
3qú
3qü
3qy
5qua
5que
5qué
5qui
5quí
5quo
3ra
3rá
3re
3ré
3ri
3rí
3ro
3ró
3ru
3rú
3rü
3ry
5rra
5rrá
5rre
5rré
5rri
5rrí
5rro
5rró
5rru
5rrú
5rry
3sa
3sá
3se
3sé
3si
3sí
3so
3só
3su
3sú
3sü
3sy
5sha
5shá
5she
5shé
5shi
5shí
5sho
5shó
5shu
5shú
5shy
3ta
3tá
3te
3té
3ti
3tí
3to
3tó
3tu
3tú
3tü
3ty
5tha
5thá
5the
5thé
5thi
5thí
5tho
5thó
5thu
5thú
5thy
5tra
5trá
5tre
5tré
5tri
5trí
5tro
5tró
5tru
5trú
5try
5tsa
5tsá
5tse
5tsé
5tsi
5tsí
5tso
5tsó
5tsu
5tsú
5tsy
5txa
5txá
5txe
5txé
5txi
5txí
5txo
5txó
5txu
5txú
5txy
5tza
5tzá
5tze
5tzé
5tzi
5tzí
5tzo
5tzó
5tzu
5tzú
5tzy
3va
3vá
3ve
3vé
3vi
3ví
3vo
3vó
3vu
3vú
3vü
3vy
5vla
5vlá
5vle
5vlé
5vli
5vlí
5vlo
5vló
5vlu
5vlú
5vly
5vra
5vrá
5vre
5vré
5vri
5vrí
5vro
5vró
5vru
5vrú
5vry
3wa
3wá
3we
3wé
3wi
3wí
3wo
3wó
3wu
3wú
3wü
3wy
3xa
3xá
3xe
3xé
3xi
3xí
3xo
3xó
3xu
3xú
3xü
3xy
3ya
3yá
3ye
3yé
3yi
3yí
3yo
3yó
3yu
3yú
3yü
3za
3zá
3ze
3zé
3zi
3zí
3zo
3zó
3zu
3zú
3zü
3zy
5zha
5zhá
5zhe
5zhé
5zhi
5zhí
5zho
5zhó
5zhu
5zhú
5zhy
5zra
5zrá
5zre
5zré
5zri
5zrí
5zro
5zró
5zru
5zrú
5zry
%                     Ruptura de grupos consonantes                    %
ä3g2n
a3ha
ahá
áha
a3he
ahé
áhe
ahi
a3hí
áhi
a3ho
ahó
áho
ahu
a3hú
áhu
b3b
b3c
b3ch
b3cl
b3d
b3f
b3g
b3h
b3j
b3k
b3m
b3n
b3p
b3q
b3s
b2s3c
b2s3t
b2s3tr
b3t
b3tr
b3v
b3w
b3y
3by3t
b3z
c3b
c3c
c3chy3m
c3d
c3f
c3fr
ch3bl
ch3k
ch3l
chs3f
chs3t
ch3t
ch3th
ch3tl
ck3b
ck3c
ck3d
ck3f
ck3g
ck3gr
ck3h
ck3j
ck3m
ck3n
ck3p
ck3r
ck3s
ck3sg
ck3st
ck3t
ck3v
ck3w
ck3y
c3m
c3n
c3p
c3q
c3s
c3t
c3tr
3cy
c3z
c3zyn2s3k
d3b
d3c
d3ch
d3clyf3f
d3d
d3f
d3g
d3j
d3k
d3l
d3m
d3n
d3p
d3q
d3s
ds3c
d3sch
ds3cr
ds3t
ds3tr
d3v
d3w
d3y
3dy3g
d3z
d3zh
e3ha
ehá
éha
e3he
ehé
éhe
ehi
e3hí
éhi
e3ho
ehó
ého
ehu
e3hú
éhu
f3f
f3fl
f3fr
ff3s
f3g
f3h
3f2j3
f3k
f3n
f3s
f3t
ft3l
f3tr
ft3w
f3z
g3b
g3c
g3ch
g3d
g3f
g3g
g3k
g3m
g3n
g3s
gs3b
g3st
g3t
g3z
h3b
h3c
h3d
h3f
h3g
h3h
h3j
h3k
h3l
hls3t
hls3tr
h3m
h3n
hn3ch
hn3r
h3ñ
h3p
h3q
h3r
hr3l
hr3sch
h3s
h3t
h3v
h3w
h3x
h3y
h3z
iha
ihá
í3ha
ihe
ihé
í3he
i3hi
i3hí
í3hi
iho
ihó
í3ho
ihu
i3hú
í3hu
j3b
j3c
j3ch
j3h
j3j
j3l
j3z
k3b
k3ch
k3chy3m
k3k
k3s
ks3t
k3t
k3z
l3b
l3c
l3ch
l3cl
l3cr
l3d
ld3f
ld3kn
ld3m
l3dr
l3f
lf3g
l3fr
l3g
l3h
l3j
l3k
l3kh
l3kl
lk3m
lk3n
ll3c
ll3d
ll3g
ll3p
l3ly3w
l3m
lm3b
lm3gr
lm3sl
l3n
l3p
l3ph
l3q
l3r
l3s
lsh3t
ls3k
ls3t
l3t
l3th
lt3k
lt3l
l3tr
l3ts
lts3g
l3tx
l3tz
ltz3m
l3v
l3w
l3z
lz3h
lz3m
m3b
m3bl
m3br
m3c
m3d
m3f
m3g
m3h
m3j
m3k
m3k2v
m3l
m3m
mm3l
m3n
m3p
mp3f
m3pl
m3pr
m1ps
mp3t
m3q
m3s
m3schl
m3sh
m3ss
ms3t
m3t
m3v
m3w
n3b
n3c
n3ch
n3ckr
n3cl
n3cr
nc3t
n3d
n3dh
nd3l
nd3q
n3dr
nd3s
nd3w
n3f
n3fl
n3fr
n3g
ng3f
n3gh
ng3k
ng3kh
n3gl
n3gr
ngs3r
ngs3t
ngs3tr
ng3t
n3h
n3j
n3k
n3kl
n3kr
n3l
n3ll
n3m
n3n
nn3g
nn3h
nn3st
n3p
n3q
n3r
n3s
6n8s7b
6n8s7c
n2sch3w
6n8s7d
6n8s7f
6n8s7g
6n8s7k
6n8s7l
6n8s7m
6n8s7n
6n8s7p
6n8s7q
6n8s7t
6n8s7v
6n8s7w
n3t
nt3g
n3tl
nt3p
n3tr
n3ts
n3tx
n3tz
n3v
n3w
n3wh
n3wr
n3x
n3y
n3z
nz3b
nz3ch
nz3m
o3ha
ohá
óha
o3he
ohé
óhe
ohi
o3hí
óhi
o3ho
ohó
óho
ohu
o3hú
óhu
p3c
p3d
p3f
pf3t
ph3t
ph3th
p3n
p3p
p3s
3psi3c
3psi3q
3psí3q
p3t
p3tr
p3v
p3z
q3b
q3h
q3q
r3b
r3c
r3ch
r3d
rd3h
rd3m
rd3s
rd3sch
rd3schl
rd3sp
rd3st
rd3str
rd3zh
r3f
r3fb
r3g
r3gh
rg3k
r3h
r3j
r3k
rk3m
rk3w
rk3z
r3l
r2l3b
r3m
r2m3br
r3n
r2n3gr
r2n3s
r3p
r3ph
r3pl
r3pr
rp3t
r3q
r3s
r3sb
r2s3c
r3sch
r3schl
r2s3cr
r3sh
r2s3k
r2s3p
r2s3t
r2st3sn
r3t
r3th
r3thr
rt3l
rt3m
rt3n
r3tr
r3ts
rt3sch
rt3w
r3tx
r3tz
r3v
r3w
r3x
r3y
r3z
rz3b
r3zh
rz3sch
rz3w
s3c
s3ch
sch3k
sch3st
sch3t
sch3w
s3cl
s3cr
s3d
s3dr
s3f
s3fl
s3fr
s3g
s3gl
s3gr
sh3b
sh3ch
sh3cr
sh3f
sh3l
sh3m
sh3n
sh3r
sh3t
sh3v
sh3w
sh3y
s3j
s3k
s3l
s3m
s3m2n
s3n
s3ñ
s3p
s3pl
s3pr
s3q
s3r
s3s
3ß2
s3t
s2t3b
s2t3c
s2t3cl
s2t3cr
s2t3d
s2t3f
s2t3fl
s2t3fr
s2t3g
s2t3gl
s2t3gr
s2t3h
s2t3k
s2t3l
s2t3m
s2t3n
s2t3p
s2t3pr
s3tr
s2t3v
s2t3w
s3v
s3w
s3y
s3z
s3zyn2s3k
t3b
t3c
t3ch
tch3l
t3d
t3f
t3fl
t3fr
t3g
th3b
th3c
th3d
